Hawaii statutes.
§281-96 Cancellation. If the use of
the premises covered by any license becomes lost to the licensee by reason of
being sold under foreclosure proceedings, or a civil execution, or other legal
process, or for any other cause, which shall force a cessation of the business
of the licensee thereon under the license (other than by a revocation or
suspension of the licensee's license), the liquor commission may cancel or
suspend the license. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §59; RL 1935, §2628; RL 1945, §7280; RL
1955, §159-95; HRS §281-96; am L 1976, c 87, §7; gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c 171,
§30]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next